Massachusetts, session 194th, H4288.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the purposes for which funds may be expended for the
creation of affordable and attainable housing, and the preferences given to certain vocations for
affordable and attainable housing as set forth in MGL Chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024,
Affordable Homes Act, Section 32, Seasonal Communities, Subsection (d), the Town of
Chatham may expend funds designated for the acquisition, creation and preservation of year-
round affordable and attainable housing for individuals who, by vocation, are Commercial
Fishermen.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1